Washington statutes.
RCW 35.88.060

Health officers and mayor must enforce.

The city health officer, city physician, board of public health, mayor, or any other officer, who has the sanitary condition of the city or town in charge, shall see that the provisions of this chapter are enforced and upon complaint being made to any such officer of an alleged violation, he or she shall immediately investigate the said complaint and if the same appears to be well-founded he or she shall file a complaint against the person or persons violating any of the provisions of this chapter and cause their arrest and prosecution.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2130; 1965 c 7 s 35.88.060. Prior: 1899 c 70 s 4; RRS s 9476.]